src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc !!= @CODE@ Only nominatives. Placenames loan. Not used in Smj-propernouns
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: Jordandalen # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Jordandalen:                Jordandalen+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!$ Jordandalenij:              Jordandalen+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!$ Jordandalenis:              Jordandalen+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org !!= @CODE@  Only nominative. Organizations loan.Not used in smj-propernouns
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: Samfunnsavdelingen # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Samfunnsavdelingen:                Samfunnsavdelingen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!$ Samfunnsavdelingenij:              Samfunnsavdelingen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!$ Samfunnsavdelingenis:              Samfunnsavdelingen+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON LONDON-surplc
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDONDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONUCASE ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONUCASE-ORG ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL-PLC
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ        ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONUCASE-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ             ;


LEXICON LONDONUCASE ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
         +Sg+Nom:     K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:     RHyph ;
         +Sg+Gen:a    K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:a    RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc:av   K     ;
         +Sg+Ill:ij   K     ;
         +Sg+Ine:in   K     ;
         +Sg+Ela:is   K     ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj   K     ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:an   K     ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:as   K     ;
         +Sg+Com:ijn  K     ;
            +Ess:in   K     ;
         +Pl+Nom:a    K     ;
         +Pl+Gen:ij   K     ;
         +Pl+Gen:ij   RHyph ;
         +Pl+Acc:ijt  K     ;
         +Pl+Ill:ijda K     ;
         +Pl+Ine:ijn  K     ;
         +Pl+Ela:ijs  K     ;
         +Pl+Com:ij   K     ;

LEXICON LONDONUCASE-ORG ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
         +Sg+Nom:    K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:    RHyph ;
         +Sg+Gen:a   K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:a   RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc:av  K     ;
         +Sg+Ill:ij  K     ;
         +Sg+Ine:in  K     ;
         +Sg+Ela:is  K     ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj  K     ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:an  K     ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:as  K     ;
         +Sg+Com:ijn K     ;
            +Ess:in  K     ;
! +Pl+Nom:a K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ij RHyph ;
! +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
! +Pl+Com:ij K ;


LEXICON LONDONUCASE-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
         +Sg+Nom:    K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:    RHyph ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a   K     ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:a   RHyph ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:av  K     ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ij  K     ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:in  K     ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:is  K     ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:aj  K     ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:an  K     ;
 +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:as  K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ijn K     ;
    +Ess+Err/Orth:in  K     ;
! +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:a K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ij K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ij RHyph ;      !
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ijt K ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:ijda K ;
! +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:ijn K ;
! +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:ijs K ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:ij K ;

!! JOKULL-plc are placenames. Lexicon added to make the code compile (?)

LEXICON JOKULL-plc
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDONDECL-PLC ; !!= @CODE@ Placenames. NB added to make the code compile, needs revision. Gets an odd syllable case marking. Non-assimilated stems.

!!€gt-norm: Drangajökull # Even-syllable test
!!€ Drangajökull:                Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Drangajökullij:              Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Drangajökullis:              Drangajökull+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela


!! Words in lexicon ANAR  end on conconant, no cg, case marking with ill -ij, ela -is. Gets an odd syllable case marking. Lule sami stems.

!LEXICON ANAR-ani !!= @CODE@ Animals. Not used in smj-propernouns. 
! +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> ANARDECL ;

!LEXICON ANAR-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects. Not used in smj-propernouns
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ANARDECL ;

!LEXICON ANAR-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations. Not used in smj-propernouns
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ANARDECL-ORG ;

LEXICON ANAR-mal !!= @CODE@ Male names. 
 +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%> ANARDECL ;
 
!!€gt-norm: Jusát # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Jusát:                 Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Jusádij:               Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Jusádis:               Jusát+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON ANAR-fem !!= @CODE@ Female names. Not used in smj-propernouns
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%> ANARDECL ;

!LEXICON ANAR-sur !!= @CODE@ Surnames. Not used in smj-propernouns
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%> ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-plc !!= @CODE@  Place names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ANARDECL-PLC ;

!!€gt-norm: Guhttás # Odd-syllable test
!!€ Guhttás:                 Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Guhttásij:               Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Guhttásis:               Guhttás+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ANARDECL ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL ;

!LEXICON ANARDECL-ORG ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
! @U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL-ORG ;

LEXICON ANARDECL-PLC ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ     ; ! XXX Sub?

LEXICON ANAR-OBL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONDECL ;

!LEXICON ANAR-OBL-ORG
! @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONDECL-ORG ;


!! Words in PIPPI lexicons are i-final, have no cg, no second syllable vowel change, and get odd syllable case marking with acc -hav, ill -hij, elat -his, etc. Works as "riebij", but without the -j in nominative (it should maybe be Sirij and Pippij in nom?) and without cg. The last syllable is unstressed. Non-assimilated stems. 


LEXICON PIPPI-ani !!= @CODE@ IVowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Animals.
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> PIPPIDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Rullahuuli # Even-syllable test
!!€ Rullahuuli:               Rullahuuli+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom
!!€ Rullahuulihij:              Rullahuuli+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill
!!€ Rullahuulihis:              Rullahuuli+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela


LEXICON PIPPI-obj !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Object names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> PIPPIDECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Audi # Even-syllable test
!!€ Audi:                 Audi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Audihij:              Audi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Audihis:              Audi+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

LEXICON PIPPI-org !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where caseendings are added directly, no cg. organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> PIPPIDECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Kon-Tiki # Even-syllable test
!!€ Kon-Tiki:               Kon-Tiki+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
!!€ Kon-Tikihij:              Kon-Tiki+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
!!€ Kon-Tikihis:              Kon-Tiki+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela

LEXICON PIPPI-mal !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case are added directly, no cg. Male names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>            PIPPIDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Gianni # Even-syllable test
!!€ Gianni:               Gianni+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Giannihij:              Gianni+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Giannihis:              Gianni+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

LEXICON PIPPI-fem !!= @CODE@ Vowel-final names where case endings are added directly, no cg. Female names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>            PIPPIDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #     ;

!!€gt-norm: Guri # Even-syllable test
!!€ Guri:               Guri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Gurihij:              Guri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Gurihis:              Guri+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela
