src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Guhttás ANAR-plc ;
Joret:Jored9 ANAR-mal ;
Jusát:Jusád9  ANAR-mal ;
Lemet:Lemed9  ANAR-mal ;
Ommot:Ommod9 ANAR-mal ;
Sáller ANAR-plc ;
